Washington statutes.
RCW 23B.08.060

Staggered terms for directors.

(1) The articles of incorporation may provide for staggering the terms of directors by dividing the total number of directors into two or three groups, with each group containing one-half or one-third of the total, as near as may be. In that event, the terms of directors in the first group expire at the first annual shareholders' meeting after their election, the terms of the second group expire at the second annual shareholders' meeting after their election, and the terms of the third group, if any, expire at the third annual shareholders' meeting after their election. At each annual shareholders' meeting held thereafter, directors shall be chosen for a term of two years or three years, as the case may be, to succeed those whose terms expire.

(2) If cumulative voting is authorized, any provision establishing staggered terms of directors shall provide that at least three directors shall be elected at each annual shareholders' meeting.

[ 1989 c 165 s 85.]